dev/25072012-apertium-tur.tur.lexc
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
!
!!! TV BELOW
!
!LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!
!%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
! aç<t><tv><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
! kulluk e<t><tv><caus_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
! gi<t><tv><caus_ar><aor_ar> 
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
! çık<tv><caus_art><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR
! al<tv><caus_dir>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR  
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
! üş<tv><caus_it>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
! ak<tv><caus_it><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
! bekle<tv><caus_t>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;



LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON Verbs
iç:iç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! "drink"
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
üş:üş VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR ; ! ""
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kulluk% et:kulluk% e%{t%} VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
üz:üz VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
aş:aş VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
burk:burk VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
der:der VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
geç:geç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
gi:gi VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kaç:kaç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
sal:sal VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
sok:sok VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
tık:tık VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
tırs:tırs VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
yıl:yıl VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
şaş:şaş VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
aksat:aksat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
alçalt:alçalt VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
asılan:asılan VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
aydınlat:aydınlat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
devit:devit VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dönüş:dönüş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
eriş:eriş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gereksin:gereksin VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
anımsa:anımsa VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
ağırsa:ağırsa VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
derecele:derecele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dipçikle:dipçikle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
doğra:doğra VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dürümle:dürümle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
emayla:emayla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
esle:esle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
eşle:eşle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
frezele:frezele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gerekse:gerekse VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kışkır:kışkır VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
ahla:ahla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
azal:azal VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dinel:dinel VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dönele:dönele VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
ekşi:ekşi VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
esri:esri VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
fışla:fışla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gedil:gedil VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gıcırda:gıcırda VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kirlet:kirlet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "dirty"
kırp:kırp VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "trim"
kışkır:kışkır VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "provoke"
kok:kok VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "smell"
kork:kork VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "fear, scare"
kucakla:kucakla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "embrace"
külle:külle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "cover with ashes"
menet:menet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "preclude"
not:not al VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "take a note"
önemse:önemse VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "care"
öngör:öngör VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "set forth"
panikle:panikle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "get into a panic"
reddet:reddet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "refuse"
sağal:sağal VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "recover"
sağla:sağla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "provide"
sahiplen:sahiplen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "lay claims to"
sark:sark VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "depend from"
sars:sars VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "jolt"
seç:seç VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "choose"
sil:sil VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "erase, delete"
sıyır:sıyır VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "abrade"
soğu:soğu VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "get cold"
süz:süz VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "filter"
tepele:tepele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "defeat"
tık:tık VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "cram into"
ucuzla:ucuzla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "become cheap"
üslen:üslen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "use place for military base"
yama:yama VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "revamp"
yanıl:yanıl VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "be mistaken"
yar:yar VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "split"
yıprat:yıprat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "wear out"
yor:yor VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "ascribe"
yürü:yürü VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "walk"
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "flow, leak"
alevlen:alevlen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "catch on fire"
algıla:algıla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "comprehend"
alkışla:alkışla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "clap"
azmet:azmet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "determine"
becer:becer VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "accomplish"
bin:bin VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "mount, ride"
borçlan:borçlan VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "owe"
çağla:çağla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "murmur"
çek:çek VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "pull"
çeşitle:çeşitle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "vary"
çıkar:çıkar VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "eject, remove"
dal:dal VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "dive"
destekle:destekle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "support"
dil:dil VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "slice"
doğrula:doğrula VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "confirm"
doyur:doyur VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "feed"
emret:emret VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "command"
esinle:esinle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "inspire"
ever:ever VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "give somebody in marriage"
ger:ger VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "stretch"
gerile:gerile VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "retrograde"
gizle:gizle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "hide"
götür:götür VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "carry"
hisset:hisset VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "feel"
içer:içer VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "include"
izle:izle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "watch"
kak:kak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "push"
kapış:kapış VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "compete"
kaybet:kaybet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "lose"
kayna:kayna VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "boil"
